Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7955.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 19-14.3-1.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 19-14.3 entitled
"Currency Transmissions" is hereby amended to read as follows:
19-14.3-1.1. Definitions.
In addition to the definitions provided in § 19-14-1 the following definitions are applicable
to this chapter:
(1) “Blockchain analytics” means the analysis of data from blockchains or public
distributed ledgers, including associated transaction information.
(2) “Blockchain analytics software” means a software service that uses blockchain
analytics data to provide risk-specific information about virtual currency wallet addresses, among
other things.
(3) “Control” means:
(i) When used in reference to a transaction or relationship involving virtual currency, the
power to execute unilaterally or prevent indefinitely a virtual currency transaction; and
(ii) When used in reference to a person, the direct or indirect power to direct the
management, operations, or policies of the person through legal or beneficial ownership of twenty-
five percent (25%) or more of the voting power in the person or under a contract, arrangement, or
understanding.
(4) “Department” means the department of business regulation, division of banking.
(5) “Exchange,” used as a verb, means to assume control of virtual currency from or on

behalf of a resident, at least momentarily, to sell, trade, or convert:
(i) Virtual currency for legal tender, bank credit, or one or more forms of virtual currency;
or
(ii) Legal tender or bank credit for one or more forms of virtual currency.
(6) “Existing customer” means an individual who has been a customer with a virtual
currency kiosk operator for more than thirty (30) days after the customer’s first financial transaction
with the virtual currency kiosk operator.
(7) “Legal tender” means a medium of exchange or unit of value, including the coin or
paper money of the United States, issued by the United States or by another government.
(8) “Licensee” means a person licensed under this chapter.
(9) “Monetary value” means a medium of exchange, whether or not redeemable in money.
(10) “New customer” means an individual who has never previously transacted with the
virtual currency kiosk operator. The new customer shall remain defined as such during the thirty-
day (30) period after the first financial transaction with the virtual currency kiosk operator.
Following the thirty-day (30) period, a new customer automatically converts to an existing
customer.
(11) “Reciprocity agreement” means an arrangement between the department and the
appropriate licensing agency of another state that permits a licensee operating under a license
granted by the other state to engage in currency transmission business activity with or on behalf of
a resident.
(12) “Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored
in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.
(13) “Registry” means the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System.
(14) “Resident”:
(i) Means a person that:
(A) Is domiciled in this state;
(B) Is physically located in this state for more than one hundred eighty-three (183) days of
the previous three hundred sixty-five (365) days; or
(C) Has a place of business in this state; and
(ii) Includes a legal representative of a person that satisfies subsection (14)(i) of this
section.
(15) “Responsible individual” means an individual who has managerial authority with
respect to a licensee’s currency transmission business activity with or on behalf of a resident.
(16) “Sign” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:
LC005563 - Page 2 of 5

(i) To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or
(ii) To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or
process.
(17) “State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the
United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the
United States.
(18) “Store,” except in the phrase “store of value,” means to maintain control of virtual
currency on behalf of a resident by a person other than the resident. “Storage” and “storing” have
corresponding meanings.
(19) “Transaction hash” means a unique identifier made up of a string of characters that
act as a record of and provide proof that the transaction was verified and added to the blockchain.
(20) “Transfer” means to assume control of virtual currency from or on behalf of a resident
and to:
(i) Credit the virtual currency to the account of another person;
(ii) Move the virtual currency from one account of a resident to another account of the
same resident; or
(iii) Relinquish control of virtual currency to another person.
(21) “U.S. Dollar equivalent of virtual currency” means the equivalent value of a particular
virtual currency in United States dollars shown on a virtual currency exchange based in the United
States for a particular date or period specified in this chapter.
(22) “Virtual currency address” means an alphanumeric identifier associated with a virtual
currency wallet identifying the location to which a virtual currency transaction can be sent.
(23) “Virtual currency business activity” means:
(i) Exchanging, transferring, or storing virtual currency whether directly or through an
agreement with a virtual currency control-services vendor;
(ii) Holding electronic precious metals or electronic certificates representing interests in
precious metals on behalf of another person or issuing shares or electronic certificates representing
interests in precious metals; or
(iii) Exchanging one or more digital representations of value used within one or more
online games, game platforms, or family of games for:
(A) Virtual currency offered by or on behalf of the same publisher from which the original
digital representation of value was received; or
(B) Legal tender or bank credit outside the online game, game platform, or family of games
offered by or on behalf of the same publisher from which the original digital representation of value
LC005563 - Page 3 of 5

was received.
(24) “Virtual currency control-services vendor” means a person who has control of virtual
currency solely under an agreement with a person who, on behalf of another person, assumes
control of virtual currency.
(25) “Virtual currency kiosk” or “kiosk” means an electronic terminal acting as a
mechanical agent of the virtual currency kiosk operator that enables the virtual currency kiosk
operator to facilitate the exchange of virtual currency for money, bank credit, or other virtual
currency including, but not limited to:
(i) Connecting directly to a separate “virtual currency exchange” that performs the actual
virtual currency transmission; or
(ii) Drawing upon the virtual currency in the possession of the electronic terminal’s
operator.
(26) “Virtual-currency kiosk operator” means a person or business entity that engages in
virtual-currency business activity via a virtual currency kiosk located in this state or a person who
owns, operates, or manages a virtual currency kiosk located in this state through which virtual
currency business activity is offered. This definition applies whether or not the operator owns the
kiosks used in transactions, or if they provide custodial or non-custodial services. For the purpose
of this definition, the term also includes any person or business entity that facilitates or enables the
purchase of virtual currency through a digital product or application that directs a customer to remit
payment in person, including through a clerk or other intermediary, for the purpose of completing
the transaction.
(27) “Virtual currency kiosk transaction” means a transaction conducted or performed, in
whole or in part, by electronic means via a virtual currency kiosk or through a digital product or
application that directs a customer to remit payment in person, including through a clerk or other
intermediary, for the purpose of completing the transaction. Virtual currency kiosk transaction also
means a transaction made at a virtual currency kiosk to purchase virtual currency with fiat currency
or to sell virtual currency for fiat currency.
(28) “Virtual currency wallet” means a software application or other mechanism providing
a means for holding, storing, and transferring virtual currency.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005563
========
LC005563 - Page 4 of 5